Title
Review for Big Daddy (1999)
Number of Reviews
28

Author
Jamie Peck
Rating: *** (out of four)
TriStar / 1:34 / 1999 / PG-13 (language, crude humor)
Cast: Adam Sandler; Cole & Dylan Sprouse; Joey Lauren Adams; Leslie
Mann; Allen Covert; Peter Dante; Kristy Swanson; Jon Stewart; Rob
Schneider; Steve Buscemi; Joseph Bologna
Director: Dennis Dugan
Screenplay: Steve Franks; Tim Herlihy; Adam Sandler
Late in the new Adam Sandler vehicle "Big Daddy," a character makes the
observation that "Most critics are cynical a--holes." The line is played
for a laugh, coming straight from the mouth of an adorable little boy,
but given that Sandler co-wrote "Big Daddy"'s screenplay (with Steve
Franks and frequent collaborator Tim Herlihy), perhaps it suggests some
pointed hidden meaning. See, critics have never really been all that
kind to Sandler, an ex-"Saturday Night Live" cast member whose
constantly soaring popularity at the box office seems to be inversely
related to their consistently declining opinion of his films.
But lo and behold: "Big Daddy" rates pretty good as a comedy and better
as a Sandler opus - a silly, sappy concoction that, yes, probably only
cynical a--holes will be able to out-and-out resist. Sandler tones his
patented obnoxiousness down in favor of appealing to what could be his
largest audience yet, meanwhile eliminating a lot of the irritating
elements from past cinematic ventures. There's no smug inanity like in
"Billy Madison." No fingernails-on-the-blackboard baby-voice like in
"The Waterboy." No sugary sentiment like in "The Wedding Singer" - until
an overwrought send-off piles it on thick, that is. But for the most
part, "Big Daddy" taps Sandler highs unheard of since the randy golf
farce "Happy Gilmore."
Sandler stars here as immature New York law school grad Sonny Koufax,
but before you begin to ponder the notion of Sandler respectfully
addressing a judge, please note that the guy lives off a huge insurance
settlement from a taxi mishap and entertains himself by tossing tree
branches in front of Central Park rollerbladers. All typical Sandler
hijinks. It's an atypical Sandler plot revelation, though, when the
abrasive actor grows a heart after taking an abandoned five-year-old
(Cole and Dylan Sprouse) under his wing. The kid is not his son, but
Sonny conveniently uses him to falsely flaunt fatherhood-esque
responsibility in front of his frazzled girlfriend (Kristy Swanson).
Alas, a reconciliation ain't in the cards. She, sick of his man-child
ways (maybe she's seen his movies), leaves him for a beard-and
cardigan-sporting grandpa-type, and even he agrees that Sandler suffers
from lack of ambition. "Hey, Old Man River," Sonny retorts. "Zip it."
Too late. The "Austin Powers" sequel beat "Big Daddy" to that punchline
and racks up a more solid laugh quotient, but the plights of Sonny's
so-called parenting evokes hefty yucks and yuks nonetheless. Let's just
say that Dr. Spock he's not - Sonny's answer to every problem is
newspaper, helpful for the absorption of spilled milk, wet beds and
vomit. Yes, Virginia, bodily fluids and Sandler shtick still go together
hand-in-hand.
But in "Big Daddy," the creative mind seems to be maturing - slowly but
surely - even as it panders to lowbrow tastes. When two of Sonny's
college buds (Allen Covert and Peter Dante) are introduced as gay lovers
with a sudden liplock, the stage is set for homophobic humor which
thankfully never arrives, using the pair to instead make light of public
discomfort with same-sex affection. Elsewhere, Sandler's frat-boy
sensibilities come into focus, especially in the portrayal of a dopey
Eastern European delivery guy (fellow "SNL" alum Rob Schneider) who pals
around with Sonny. Forget that Jar Jar Binks. Schneider makes for the
season's most potentially offensive ethnic stereotyping.
"I keep hoping the kid'll change him," bemoaned a viewer to her
companion after the umpteenth instance of Sonny's bad influence rubbing
off on the tyke. Duh. Sandler's guaranteed reformation is strictly
been-there, done-that as a story arc, so credit must be given to a
colorful supporting ensemble for providing ample distraction - some of
whom you might be surprised to find in a Sandler flick. They include
glib Jon Stewart as Sonny's roommate, sweet Joey Lauren Adams as Sonny's
new squeeze and witchy Leslie Mann as Sonny's longtime adversary. Those
Sprouse brothers are promising as well. Let's hope they pass on the
impending sitcom and home video deals.
Sandler, too, stays on par with his castmates until "Big Daddy"'s
climactic courtroom trial sequence, which, in a Sandler film, feels as
out of place as ... a climactic courtroom trial sequence. Here, our
leading goofball sticks out like a sore thumb, his snarling-jester
exterior shredded so that tears can run down his cheeks, his charged
speechifying allegedly exposing vulnerability and emotion but delivered
in a hurried monotone perhaps indicative of his own disbelief at the
turn taken by his own script. Drama may never be Sandler's bag, which is
why his movies are what they are so far. Following suit, "Big Daddy"
won't melt your heart, but - when it steers clear of gavels and grovels
- it'll tickle your funny bone.
Š 1999 Jamie Peck
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit The Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/
"Here it is at last, the first 150-minute trailer. Armageddon' is cut
together like its own highlights. Take almost any 30 seconds at random,
and you'd have a TV ad. The movie is an assault on the eyes, the ears,
the brain, common sense and the human desire to be entertained. No
matter what they're charging to get in, it's worth more to get out."
-Roger Ebert on "Armageddon"

Author
James Brundage
Written by Steve Franks, Tim Herlihy, and Adam Sandler
Starring Adam Sandler, Joey Lauren Adams, Jon Stewart, Cole Sprouse, Dyland
Sprouse, Leslie Mann, and Rob Schneider
As Reviewed by James Brundage (MovieKritic2000)
 This is the part I love.  After seeing a slew of bad movies, the part where
I get to write a really rotten review is the most fun.  Seeing the movie is
both annoying and boring, but reviewing it is where I get my perverse
pleasure.  In taking these terrible movies out back and beating them with a
stick.
 This is what happens to movie critics after more than a year in the
business.  As soon as you get serious about your work, not just doing the
work on a whim as something you like to do for you High School newspaper or
your local paper, you begin to really enjoy the work.  You begin to love the
bad movies as much as you love the good ones, because, with the bad movies,
you get the pleasure of writing a really, really bad review.
 Big Daddy, Adam Sandler's latest proof to the world that he is an ape
wearing a man suit, is an attempt to emulate feelings.  It is an attempt to
make a sweet movie out of someone who still has a lisp at about 30 and is
always being accused of being a kid.  It is that kid's attempt to prove that
he is a responsible adult.
 Big Daddy attempts to be funny, it attempts to be romantic, and it attempts
to be touching.  What it succeeds at is being tedious.  The only good words
I can say about it are that it was better than The Wedding Singer.
 Big Daddy is one of those movies written by monkeys, directed by a monkey,
and acted in by monkeys that are mostly former members of the SNL cast.  The
ones that aren't are making serious career mistakes (i.e. Steve Buscemi and
Joey Lauren Adams, who have both done great work in independent film and
completely suck every time they go studio).  It tries to score its laughs
from appropriately juvenile humor: Hooters jokes, insults thrown to Little
Italy, roller bladers tripping over themselves, etc.  It fails.
 With a target demographic of teenagers, it spends its time having adults
that don't act like adults at all.  They just act like immature jerks.  Now
normally, when a jerk is on screen in Hollywood, if they do the scene right,
he comes off good, but in Big Daddy, the jerks are just plain jerks...
including Adam Sandler.
 I suppose I should probably be nicer to Adam Sandler.  Critics like me have
bashed so many of his movies saying that they have no point that he has
instead decided to make this one, which has way too much point.  Of course,
if I were to go nice on him, then he would still be making movies like The
Wedding Singer, and then where would we be?
 Twins Cole and Dylan Sprouse play Julian, a child who miraculously landed
on Entertainment Weekly's "IT list" following this movie.  My question is
"why?"  Normally, child actors are bad, but these two are especially bad.
They're so bad that I have to really wonder who else the director considered
for the part... and then have a shivering fit.
 As far as my comments to the leads, lemme say first to Joey Lauren Adams
that ever since you broke up with Kevin Smith (after he directed you to a
Golden Globe nomination for Chasing Amy), you have been on a downward
spiral.  Now let me say to Adam Sandler that you are not funny, you will
never be funny, and you will never be recognized as anything but a complete
idiot.  So, please, don't even try.

Author
David Sunga
Written by: by Steve Franks, Tim Herlihy and Adam Sandler
Starring: Adam Sandler, Joey Lauren Adams, Jon Stewart
Synopsis: 
Sonny Koufax (Adam Sandler) is a rich, childish, angry man who has just
been dumped by his girlfriend Vanessa (Kristy Swanson). In a bid to impress
Vanessa Sonny impersonates his friend Kevin (Jon Stewart) and adopts a 5
year old boy named Julian (Cole and Dylan Sprouse) while Kevin is on an
overseas trip. Under Sonny's supervision Julian soon learns to lie to
women, tell people how he "wipes his ass," throw tantrums, and scream for
his "God damned" treats. Self centered, Julian breaks a school classmate's
arm without apologizing or even realizing he has done anything wrong.
Meanwhile Sonny bribes Julian with sugary talk, food, toys, and flashy
promises in order to get the kid to perform. Not surprisingly the
government takes Julian away from Sonny's incompetent supervision, and this
leads to a custody battle. 
Opinion:
It's a movie about an embittered creep teaching a little kid to be a jerk,
and we all get cheap laughs because for 90 minutes the innocent
kindergartner never finds out what it means when he mimics all the bad boy
behavior. That's the essence of BIG DADDY. 
But there's a bigger issue involved: marketing. Movies that are rated PG
and PG-13 are heavily marketed towards children of preteen age and below.
On TV, film clips advertise these movies as family-friendly hit comedies.
Then when you go see them they turn out to be either raunchy sex acts like
Austin Powers with characters named Fat Bastard - - or BIG DADDY where
adult characters get their jollies by buddying up to naive five year olds
and encouraging them to experiment with drugs and mistreatment. 
Folks in Hollywood are trying to develop a preteen market for raunchy
stuff, but I think most American parents would agree that early childhood
is a time of mental innocence that should be protected from uncaring media
market exploitation. To many American mothers there's probably nothing more
pathetic and unsettling than the sight of a theater full of unsupervised
little eight year olds laughing raucously as movie character father Adam
Sandler jokes about a woman's "ice cold tits."
Copyright Š 1999 by David Sunga
This review and others like it can be found at 
THE CRITIC ZOO: http://www.criticzoo.com
email: zookeeper@criticzoo.com

Author
John Carroll
Big Daddy is a very enjoyable movie.  I was flipping
back and forth over the weekend trying to figure out how to review this film. 
Despite its flaws, it is still very funny and very clever.  However, its flaws
distract from the movie-going experience.  
   Adam Sandler is making his way up the ladder.  He should no longer be
regarded as a "goofball" comic.  For those of us accustomed to his
goofball antics, it is a disappointment to see him change his ways.  However,
The Wedding Singer and Big Daddy are both funny and Sandler is
not a disappointment in either.  Sandler does an admirable job as Sonny Koufax,
a lazy law school grad who won a lawsuit for $200,000 dollars and, therefore,
lounges around all day.  He works one day a week in a tollbooth and thinks he
can live this way for the rest of his life.  However, things start to change
all around him.  His girlfriend Vanessa wants him to grow up and she leaves him
for a more "mature" man.  His roommate (Jon Stewart) is leaving for
business in Asia, but before he leaves, he proposes to his girlfriend (Leslie
Mann).  Sonny hates his roommate's new fiance and cannot believe all
the changes in his life.
   Things get started as Stewart leaves the country and a child is left at
Sonny's door.  This is where the major flaws occur.  First, Stewart just
disappears. After Assuring Sonny that the child is not his son, Stewart just
disappears.  He is in the first ten minutes and the last ten minutes of the
film.  And he basically serves no purpose in either.  I have no problem with
Jon Stewart; in fact he can be quite funny.  But, he is used only as a tool to
get Sonny the child and any unknown actor could have been used.
   The other flaw is when the child, Julia, is dropped off with Sonny,
things move to fast.  They all of a sudden become great friends and Sonny
starts acting a little more civilized and mature.  These things are bothering,
but do not detract from the clever comedy in the film.  After Stewart leaves
and Sonny gets the kid, things fall into place and Sandler goes to work.
   The relationship between the child and Sonny develop nicely.  For once in
a Sandler film, there is some depth.  Sonny wants to raise the kid the way he
lives life, with the motto: "Do what you want."  But, it is great how
the plot shows maturation in Sonny through raising the kid.  But do not worry
Sandler fans, there may be a clever script and depth in the plot, but it is all
done through Sandler's humor.  Cole and Dylan Sprouse, the twin brothers who
play Julian, Sonny's adopted son, play their naive role terrifically. 
They are the perfect complement for Sandler's unpredictable comedy.  
   Joey Lauren Adams is Sandler's romance interest in the film and she turns
in a solid performance, although her role was slightly underwritten.  Rob
Schneider is great as the paranoid deliveryman.  He shows that Sandler still
knows his goofball "roots" and you can tell this is a Sandler idea. 
Schneider not only tells some great jokes himself, but he sets up Cole and
Dylan Sprouse for some of their comedy.
  Now, I was ready to give this movie a terrific rating heading into the
homestretch.  I could not even fathom the bad reviews this film was getting. 
Despite the trip-ups in the first twenty minutes of the film, the next hour
made up for it.  Then, things went sour.  Jon Stewart comes back for the ending
and things get screwed up.  After all the bonding between Sonny and the child,
Jon Stewart wins custody after realizing he was the father.  Now, you would
expect Jon to give the child to Sonny?  No, he keeps the child.  Then they all
of a sudden become good friends, Sonny starts practicing law and they end the
film as they started: with a surprise party, just Sonny is the guest of honor
this time around.  Well, this ending is just downright terrible.  How could
they do that?  They ruined a perfectly good comedy.  But, despite all of this,
I still recommend that anyone see this film.  It is funny and if your one of
these people who leaves film early, then this is the film for
you.
Two And A Half Stars our of Four Stars
The Movie Page- http://jump.to/moviepage
Reviews, Previews, News and So Much More!

Author
Stephen Sills
I was genuinely surprised by this film.  That almost all of the
attempted drama completely fails is no surprise.  Strangely enough, 
though, most of the humor fails too. Adam Sandler is by no means a
great actor, but at least he can normally be counted on to be
consistently funny.  Save for a few choice moments, his performance is
rather subdued here, and most of the one-liners and verbal humor fall
relatively flat.  This film lacks the charm of "The Wedding Singer"
and the stupid, albeit occasionally hilarious, humor of "The Water
Boy."  In short, it's a pretty drab experience.
Sandler plays Sonny Koufax, a law school graduate who has amassed an
obscenely large fortune from a frivolous lawsuit.  Having wisely
invested the money to the point where he can live off of it, he spends
his days lounging around his apartment, venturing out into the real
world once a week as a toll booth attendant.  Sonny's perfectly happy
with his existence, but his girlfriend, Vanessa (Kristy Swanson), is
fed up with his immaturity and wants to move on "to the next level" of
his life.
Sonny begins to see her point after she leaves him, and it is
reinforced when his roommate decides to move on to that next level and
successfully proposes to his girlfriend, Corinne (Leslie Mann), a
ditsy, airheaded former Hooters girl.  Getting married to a stupid, 
big-breasted bimbo doesn't really strike me as a sign of maturity, but
it does to Sonny, who finally realizes that he has to do something 
to prove his worth to Vanessa.
That thing comes in the form of Julian (Cole and Dylan Sprouse), a
young boy who is literally dropped off at his doorstep.  Julian is 
Sonny's roommate's illegitimate son.  His roommate, conveniently
enough, is out of town, so Sonny decides to take responsibility for
Julian while he is away.  He does this for a while, enjoys it, and
decides that he'd like the situation to be permanent.  Masquerading as
his roommate, he officially gains guardianship of Julian and attempts
to use his newfound responsibility as proof to Vanessa that he's
ready to proceed with his life.  Unfortunately for Sonny, she has
already found someone else, thus leaving him to care for Julian alone.
The romanticism of the situation quickly fades when the kid starts
having normal kid problems (bed-wetting, a need for continuous 
attention, and a lust for sweets to name a few).  Needless to say,
Sonny doesn't handle the situation very well.
"Big Daddy" is occasionally funny, but it lacks the big laughs
necessary to make a truly successful comedy.  Sandler's comedy works
when it's totally silly and stupid, a fact that was fully realized in
"The Water Boy."  The bonding scenes between Sonny and Julian are 
somewhat amusing, but Sandler simply isn't a good enough actor to pull
something like this off very well.  This might seem strange, but
Tom Hanks would probably be far better suited for this role.
The film is also bogged down by some embarrassingly smarmy moments
that further dull it's already not-too-sharp comedic edge.  While I
can appreciate some occasional gratuitous sentiment (I was actually
somewhat affected by the silly emotional scenes in "Armageddon,"
for Pete's sake), this film goes, way, way too far.  The creators seem
to think that they have a credible drama on their hands when they
simply do not.
"Big Daddy" features one of the strangest product placements that I've
ever seen.  The product in question is the Hooters restaurant
chain, but the film is certainly not complementary of their
waitresses.  The bimboish nature of Corinne's job is continually
brought up and joked at, but this is done so frequently that it gets
incredibly old, and is obviously a product placement when viewed with
the fact that the movie ends in a Hooters restaurant.  I've never seen
a product placement that ridicules the product that it is advertising.
In the end, "Big Daddy" is occasionally amusing, but not enough so to
get a recommendation from me.  Granted, it's not nearly as disgusting
as "Austin Powers: The Spy Who Shagged Me," but it's also not as
funny.  As such, they both even out to the same score.

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director: Dennis Dugan
Cast: Adam Sandler, Cole Sprouse, Dylan Sprouse, Jon Stewart, Leslie
Mann Joey Lauren Adams
Screenplay: Steve Franks, Tim Herlihy, Adam Sandler
Producers: Sidney Ganis, Jack Giarraputo
Runtime: 
US Distribution: Columbia
Rated PG-13: language, crude humor
Copyright 1999 Nathaniel R. Atcheson
        Adam Sandler isn't known for appearing in deep, thought-provoking
films, but he's still a really funny guy.  Most of his movies are
successful not because of the film making behind them, but because they
let Sandler do what he does best without a stupid plot to drown him
out.  Big Daddy is the first film in which the story seems more
important than Sandler's comic performance, and it's a miserable
failure.  Sandler plays a thirty-something loser who gets attached to an
orphaned young boy (played by Cole and Dylan Sprouse).  As one might
expect from the synopsis, director Dennis Dugan resorts to the usual bag
of manipulative and sentimental sequences, including a repulsive 
courtroom battle and a lot of teary scenes in which characters say
"good-bye" to one another; in addition, there's a ridiculous amount of
disgusting toilet humor (urine and vomit both get more screen time than
Sandler himself).  There's a hilarious running joke featuring a female
doctor who previously worked at Hooters, and the film features passable
performances from Sandler, Joey Lauren Adams (as the love interest), and
the two young boys, but the film on the whole is trite and
disappointingly unfunny.

Author
Robert Workman
The Happy Bastard's 30-Second Review
   Happy Gilmore as a father?  Of course!  That's the latest scenario
presented by Adam Sandler in the new movie Big Daddy, a movie that's
passable but isn't really considered some of Sandler's best work.
   He doesn't actually play Happy Gilmore in the movie, but a variation
of him.  He's Sonny Coufax, a man who's living off a settlement he got
for a cab running over his foot and his one-day-a-week gig as a
tollbooth man (Tollbooth Willie?).  His girlfriend (Kristy Swanson) is
fed up with his lifestyle and demands a change before she leaves him.
Enter a 5-year old kid, who's mysteriously dropped at his doorstep and
intended for his preppy roommate (Jon Stewart), who's off in China on a
business trip.
   From there, Coufax basically acts as the kid's father, teaching him
different things like peeing on the side of a building and tripping up
skateboarders with sticks.  He even manages to use the kid in a sort of
con game to get the attention of a beautiful law office worker (Joey
Lauren Adams), but, somehow, he also garners the attention of Social
Services, who aren't particularly pleased with Coufax's actions, as he
pretends to be his roommate to keep the kid.
   The reason I say it's not really Sandler's best work is because it
gets really sappy towards the end of a movie, showing some odd feelings
that somehow didn't really belong in a Sandler vehicle.  I mean, it fits
the movie's tone and everything, and Sandler handles it well, but it's
just oddly placed, that's all.  Fortunately, it doesn't destroy the
goofy glee path it's been following and it still makes you feel good.
   Sandler does a good job here, as he does in most of his movies.  Rob
Schneider, however, is irritating as his friend, an immigrant delivery
boy who can't read.  Stewart, in his minor time on screen, is great, and
Adams remains a joy to watch.  Look for Steve Buscemi as well as a
homeless bum.  He's a hoot.
   Directed by Dennis Dugan (director of Happy Gilmore), the movie
remains a good couple of hours to pass the time with.  Again, there are
faults, but, hey, everyone needs to get emotional sometimes.  

Author
David N. Butterworth
        If the image of Adam Sandler screaming "SOMEONE GET THIS KID A
HAPPY MEAL!!" at the top of his lungs makes you snicker, then "Big Daddy"
is definitely for you.
        Sandler's latest film (following his recent mega success with "The
Wedding Singer" and "The Waterboy") isn't much of step up from those
previous encounters, but it retains all of their good-natured affability.
Heck, I even enjoyed "Bulletproof," most notably because of the lively
pairing of Sandler and former "In Living Color" frontsman Damon Wayans.
        Here, Sandler is ably supported by twins Cole and Dylan Sprouse,
who play the post-diaper-wearing kid adopted by Sandler's character.  For
those who might be apprehensive about the film's adoption theme, fear not.
The film isn't in the same league as the detestable "Problem Child"
(ironically also directed by "Big Daddy"'s Dennis Dugan) and its equally
offensive sequel.  Similarly, for those who feel that the only decent child
actors are European, fear not again.  The Sprouse twins may be as
indistinguishable as Mary-Kate and Ashley Olsen, but they differ from those
obnoxious little automatons by being both cute yet not precocious.
        In "Big Daddy," toll-booth collector Sonny Koufax (Sandler) is
having some difficulty with his girlfriend Vanessa (played by Kristy
Swanson, the original Buffy the Vampire Slayer).  Just when things are at
their worst, a strange package is delivered to Sonny's door: a
five-year-old orphan called Julian.  Julian arrives with a note attached
that explains how he's purportedly the son of Sonny's roommate Kevin (Jon
Stewart), who's currently heading out of the country.  Like the
all-around-good-guy he is, Sonny phones Kevin at the airport, explains the
little problem, and volunteers to take care of Julian, at least for the
time being.
        Before you know it Sonny starts bonding with the little tyke (who
has a real difficulty containing his bodily fluids), seeing his new-found
parenthood as a way to prove his commitment to Vanessa.
        Although Sonny has a law degree (perhaps the first Sandler
character with brains), his parenting skills are limited at best, and the
film goes all out to create funny scenarios involving Sonny showing Julian
the ropes: teaching him to pee on buildings, eat junk food to excess, wear
ridiculous outfits, use bad language, etc.
        In the course of all this inanity (helped along by the redoubtable
Steve Buscemi as a homeless wino and Rob Schneider as an Eastern Block deli
deliveryman), Sonny falls for a corporate lawyer played by Joey Lauren
Adams ("Chasing Amy").  In "Big Daddy," Adams finally lays to rest the
rumor that she's a terrible actress.  She proves it!  The film culminates
in a "Judge Judy"-styled courtroom sequence that piles on the
sentimentality and would be a total embarrassment were it not for Sandler's
playful, puppydog persona and a strong turn by Joe Bologna as Sonny's
disapproving father.
        Although I enjoyed "Big Daddy," I wouldn't take my pre-teen
daughters to see it, since the profanity is endless and unnecessary.  In
addition, they don't need incessant Hooters' (the restaurant and beyond)
references forced down their impressionable young throats.  Adam Sandler
should stick to yelling about Happy Meals.  McDonalds is our kind of place.

Author
Ross Anthony
By Ross Anthony
I'm an Adam Sandler fan, so I was eager to see "Big Daddy." However, it's
not one of the most memorable films he'll ever make.
Basically, Adam's a 30-year old still living the life of a teenager and
liking it. But, his girlfriend has had enough of his non-committal attitude;
so 1) she takes a hike, 2) small child arrives at his doorstep, 3) Sandler
decides to adopt the kid in hopes that he'll (Sandler) will learn those
adult characteristics so desired by a girlfriend that the filmmakers didn't
spend any time making us care about.
There's really not much to say about this film. It was refreshing to here
Sandler use his regular voice and not one of his stupid character voices.
You see, I think he's both very funny and very talented on screen -- he
doesn't need the cartoon voices. Let me just go way out on a limb here and
say -- Adam Sandler has the same kind of dramatic talent in him that an
actor like ... say Tom Hanks ... has. Now, there I've said something
profoundly dissonant haven't I? Speaking of drama, "Big Daddy" is much more
of a light drama than a comedy. It certainly has comedic moments, and even
though they weren't very uniformly or artfully distributed (for instance the
ending is strangely more silly than the rest of the film); it's still
moderately funny/dramatic overall.
Grade..........................B+
Copyright Š 1999 Ross Anthony, currently based in Los Angeles, has scripted
and shot documentaries, music videos, and shorts in 35 countries across
North America, Europe, Africa and Asia. For more reviews visit:
http://RossAnthony.com

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Columbia Pictures
 Director:  Dennis Dugan
 Writer:  Steve Franks and Adam Sandler & Tim Herlihy,
story by Steve Franks
 Cast: Adam Sandler, Joey Lauren Adams, Jon Stewart,
Leslie Mann, Josh Mostel, Cole Sprouse, Dylan Sprouse,
Rob Schneider, Steve Buscemi, Kristy Swanson
   In the movie adapted from Oscar Wilde's play "An Ideal
Husband," one character states in typical Wildean prose,
"God punishes us by answering our prayers."  This is
another way of saying, "Don't wish too hard for something:
you may get it."  But what about the converse?  Let's say
that something, or somebody, is about the last thing you'd
want?  You'd be surprised how often your life would be
turned around for the better if you got it.  "Big Daddy" is
an object lesson.
   Adam Sandler's latest comedy is sure to be a big,
sentimental hit with his extensive fan club but not so prized
by more mature film lovers.  Sandler's character performs
in the role of a 30-year-old lazy, single guy whose girl
friend is about to split in disgust over the man's languor. 
Would you imagine that someone with a law degree who
can't get up the energy to work more than one day a week
as a toll collector would want to adopt a 5-year-old kid? 
But ironies are the lifeblood of filmed fantasies.  Surely the
plot won't be spoiled for you if you have advance
knowledge that boy and new dad will bond, the little one
turning the caretaker's life around while the kid will learn
lots of cute new ways to survive in the urban jungle.
   "Big Daddy" is a big-hearted sentimental comedy that
might make you wonder whether you'd really want to be
brought up for a single month by a hang-loose dude like
Sonny Koufax (Adam Sandler).  If you were treated by this
likable fellow with a good deal of respect, never yelled at 
or punished in any way, you'd think you were in stepdaddy
heaven.  But think again: what sort of adult would you
become if you learned that it's OK to pee against the wall
when a restaurant won't let you use its bathroom; that it's
cute to train yourself to regurgitate slowly and then draw
the disgorgement back into your throat before it hits the
ground; that there's nothing wrong with breaking into a
man's town house when the resident refuses to give you
candy and to rob him of his watch and CD's; that it's no
big deal to give legal authorities a false name when it suits
your ego?  As Koufax says to his friend, he gives the kids
options instead of ultimata and lets the boy make his own
choices.  Some choices indeed!
   The story opens as Koufax gets a stern lecture from his
girl friend, Vanessa (Kristy Swanson), who is about to
leave him because she is fed up with his lack of ambition. 
Koufax, who has a law degree but refuses to take the bar
because he prefers to be an idler on the $200,000 he won
in a lawsuit, is upset, but his life is about to change.  When
his roommate leaves town on an assignment in China,
Julian (played alternately by twins Cole and Dylan
Sprouse) turn up at his door, a lovable but sad,
monosyllable kid who does not yet know that he is the love
child of the man who shares Sonny's apartment.  Since the
social services office is closed, Sonny takes the kid to
Central Park to teach him how to trip rollerbladers.  When
the lad has to pee and the snooty maitre d' at a posh
restaurant announces a customers' only policy, Sonny
teaches Julian how to use the wall. And when the two
show up late at McDonald's for the breakfast special,
Sonny plays role model once again by picking up a
customer's fries and heaving them to the floor. (In a later
experience, he teaches the kid how to get half-off on food
by throwing the cans to the floor and getting a discount for
the dents.)
   While "Big Daddy" does not have nearly the raunchy
vocabulary of the far more imaginative, even exhilarating
"South Park," Steve Franks--who wrote the story on which
the movie is based--manipulates the audience into thinking
that kidding around about drug-taking and talking
obsessively about your ex-girlfriend's sister's former job at
Hooter's is a hoot and a holler. "Big Daddy" does try to be
political correct in one way--in using two of Sonny's friends
to demonstrate that gay is perfectly OK--but the two
lawyers display their affection is such sloppy and
hackneyed ways that you'd think the whole movie is a
primer on being cool.
   Steve Buscemi makes a fool of himself by ineptly playing
a homeless man as though he were a darling character out
of a Damon Runyon story, and in the movie's coda, Sonny
proceeds to teach his roommate how to be silly enough as
well so that little Julian can love him too.
   Sandler has a better role than he enjoyed in "The
Waterboy"--which is not saying a heck of a lot--but he has
a way to go before reaching the peak he hit in "The
Wedding Singer."  The real scene-stealer of the movie is
not the kid or the stepdaddy, but Joey Lauren Adams (from
"Chasing Amy"), who seems to be the only one who knows
how to act.  "Big Daddy" is directed by Dennis Dugan, who
appears to be well aware of his targeted audience.

Author
Steve Rhodes
Adam Proudly-Rude-And-Obnoxious Sandler is back.  This time he uses his
mean-spirited shtick to teach our kids a series of would-be humorous,
bad lessons.  From how to ridicule poor, minimum wage clerks to how to
cause bodily injury to innocent bystanders, Sandler lays it on thick.
"From now on, you do what you want to do" is the credo he gives to the
5-year-old under his care.  And when Sandler says anything, it means
exactly that.  Do anything you want without any regard to whether it
hurts you or others.  Telling a 5-year-old that life has no limits is
the height of irresponsibility.
The contrived setup has Sonny Koufax (Sandler) adopting Julian (played
by twins Cole and Dylan Sprouse), the recently discovered son of his
roommate (Jon Stewart).  Sonny hopes that this will impress his current
girlfriend, Vanessa (Kristy Swanson).  It doesn't.  By the movie's
schmaltzy ending, it will, however, have won over the heart of his new
love interest, played by Joey Lauren Adams from CHASING AMY.
The movie shamelessly tries to shock you -- from the unexpected, big gay
kiss to the vomit scene so realistic that you can see the exact contents
of Julian's most recent meal.  In a scene that grade-schoolers will no
doubt attempt to emulate, Julian spits up a long, sticky stream of the
contents of his mouth until it touches the ground and then sucks it all
back in.  Sonny beams with admiration as his buddies watch the new trick
that he has taught his son.
The sadistic movie has Sonny showing Julian how to have fun by tripping
speeding rollerbladers with a stick.  Julian, no surprise, will emulate
this and other bad behavior to the detriment of his classmates,
including one whose arm gets broken in the process.  Julian, like his
adoptive father, thinks such anti-social antics are funny.
In the movie's signature comedy routine, Sonny teaches Julian how to
urinate in public.  When Julian has trouble peeing on a restaurant wall,
Sonny pees with him so the kid will be properly motivated.
The movie's most egregious action has Sonny taking Julian for a late
morning breakfast at McDonald's.  When they arrive too late, Sonny
screams obscenities at the friendly but helpless clerk who tells him
that breakfast is no longer available.  If you don't get exactly what
you want in life, when you want it, the movie wants us to feel empowered
to demean those who've had the bad luck to cross our paths.
The humor generally is on the level of laughing about whether Julian can
wipe his own rear.  Some jokes are funny, even if barely.  For a
nightlight for Julian, Sonny pulls out a large neon sign that points to
"Live Nudes."
In a funny joke that went over much better in the faster paced trailers,
Sonny finds out that his girlfriend has dumped him for a 60-year-old
guy.  "He has a 5-year plan," Vanessa gives as the reason she has fallen
for her new beau.  "What is it?" Sonny asks sarcastically.  "Don't die?"
The movie, which celebrates bad behavior, will undoubtedly have
audiences composed largely of 9-14 year olds, as was ours.  The
marketing of the movie is clearly aimed at that group.  The tearjerker
ending tries to eradicate the teachings of the rest of the movie with a
big message that you should call your father up and tell him that you
love him.  It doesn't fly.  It's like a murderer showing up at the
funeral to say how sorry he was that the deceased passed away.  Nice
sentiment, but much too late.
BIG DADDY runs 1:33.  It is rated PG-13 for language and some crude
humor.  The film is acceptable for teenagers but questionable for those
much younger.
My son Jeffrey, age 10, loved the film and gave it *** 1/2, saying it
really cracked him up.  Except for the throwing up and spitting, he
liked it all.
Email: Steve.Rhodes@InternetReviews.com
Web: http://www.InternetReviews.com

Author
Bob Bloom
 Big Daddy (1999) 2 1/2 stars out of 4. Starring Adam Sandler, Cole and
Dylan Sprouse, Joey Lauren Adams, Rob Schneider, Leslie Mann and Jon
Stewart.
 A sure sign of a pending apocalypse: I enjoyed Adam Sandler's new movie.
 In "Big Daddy," Sandler takes another tentative step toward playing an
adult, instead of his usual overgrown adolescent dufus.
 This process began with "The Wedding Singer," skipping a step along the
way with The Waterboy.
 In "Big Daddy," Sandler plays Sonny Koufax, a law school graduate who
works once a week as a toll booth operator while living off the $200,000 he
was awarded from a traffic accident lawsuit. (A taxicab had run over his
foot.)
 When he is not working, Sonny just loafs around his apartment, eating
carry-in food and watching sports on his big-screen television.
 One day, a 5-year-old boy, Julian, is dropped off at the apartment Sonny
shares with his law school buddy, Kevin. Julian is Kevin's son from a
long-ago one-night stand. With Kevin out of town, Sonny adopts Julian under
the false pretense of being his biological father.
 Sonny is under the misguided impression that adopting Julian will impress
his girlfriend, Vanessa, and that she will take him back, realizing he is
ready to accept responsibility.
 Of course, everything goes wrong. Vanessa dumps him, so Sonny tries to
return Julian to social services. However, he agrees to take care of him
until the agency can find a good home for the boy.
 All this is pure dramatic - or comic, if you will - license. No social
service agency in the world would be so inept as to leave a child with an
Adam Sandler character, but this is the movies, so let's be charitable.
 As time passes, Sonny and Julian form a warm, loving relationship. Sonny
teaches Julian such useful skills as how to tumble roller bladers and how
to relieve himself against a wall when no bathroom is available.
 Sonny also allows Julian to wear whatever clothes he likes and to go by
whatever name he prefers. (Julian chooses Frankenstein for some odd
reason.)
 While "Big Daddy" is replete with a year's allowance of bathroom and vomit
humor, it also is a movie with heart.
 Sonny does come to love Julian, and vice versa. He sends the boy to
school, helps him with his homework and tries to give him a good home.
 Things do begin to unravel when social services officials learn of Sonny's
ruse and take the boy away.
 But being a comedy, everything works out for the best by the final fade-out.
 Sandler is actually likable as Sonny. He adds some warmth and heart to his
usual comic repertoire of loud voices and funny faces, but even those are
toned down from his previous outings.
 A fine supporinting cast, including Rob Schneider as the delivery boy who
spends so much time at Sandler's apartment that he is considered one of the
family, and Joey Lauren Adams as Layla, the young attorney who comes to
love Sonny for his humor and compassion.
 Twins Cole and Dylan Sprouse are cute and not too obnoxious as Julian,
while Leslie Mann adds a nice comic flair as Corinne, Kevin's fiance - and
Sonny's mortal enemy - who used to work at Hooters and is the butt of many
jokes.
 Another of the movie's finer points is the positive portrayal of two of
Sonny and Kevin's law school friends who are gay and have a solid, loving
relationship. It is a minor plot point, but one that adds to the overall
adult tone of the film.
 "Big Daddy" can stand as one big promotion for Hooters because of all the
references to Corrine's time their as well as a funny closing sequence that
wraps up all the film's loose ends.
 The script by Steve Franks, Tim Herlihy and Sandler, based on a story by
Franks, is a bit crude and vulgar, but ultimately it is cuddly and
touching.
And whoever thought you'd see those words in a review about an Adam Sandler
movie. Just goes to show that the human race is constantly evolving.
 Bob Bloom is the film critic at the Journal and Courier in Lafayette, IN.
He can be reached by e-mail at bloom@journal-courier.com or at
cbloom@iquest.net

Author
Eugene Novikov
Starring Adam Sandler, Cole Sprouse, Dylan Sprouse, Joey Lauren Adams,
Steve Buscemi, Leslie Mann. Rated PG-13.
Adam Sandler has become one of the most bankable stars of the decade,
with an impressive list of box-office and video winners under his belt.
It's a shame that his films aren't as consistently good cinematically as
they are at the box-office; since he became popular, they have ranged
from the sublime (Happy Gilmore, The Wedding Singer) to the abysmal
(Billy Madison, The Waterboy). Now comes Big Daddy, a film that has more
in common with Wedding Singer than any of the other films, but lacks
that comedy's charm, replacing it with hackneyed aaw-gosh sweetness
which is the last thing we want to see from Sandler.
Many parts of Big Daddy's premise are by now trite: Sonny Koufax, a law
school graduate who decided to throw his life away and become a toll
collector, stumbles upon a 5 year old kid named Julian, evidently the
son of one of his pals, who he never knew had a son. The boy's father
just left the country on business and isn't expected to be back for a
few months. At first Sonny decides to keep the kid at his house for the
night and give him to social services in the morning.
When he comes to social services, posing as the father, to give the kid
away to a foster family, he changes his mind and decides to keep the
little bugger. He does it so that he can impress his girlfriend (Joey
Lauren Adams), who insists that Sonny "refuses to move on to the next
stage of [his] life." He hopes that this kid can strengthen their
volatile relationship much like a woman might get pregnant to save a
marriage.
Much to Sonny's surprise, his girlfriend has already dumped him for an
old guy with a five-year plan, and he finds that he is stuck with the
kid until social services can line up a foster family for him.
Inevitably, Sonny and Julian build a relationship of their own, Julian
becoming a son to Sonny and Sonny a father to Julian. But all can't be
that simple as social services discover that Sonny isn't really Julian's
father and threaten arrest.
I can't say that I was bored watching Big Daddy because it is an utterly
harmless, lighthearted film. Admittedly some of it is amusing, and some
irresistibly cute. But David Dugan, who worked with Sandler previously
on Happy Gilmore (aside from lensing losers such as Problem Child and
Beverly Hills Ninja) proves incapable of maintaining the hilarity, nor
can he introduce any credible pathos to keep us emotionally involved
with these characters.
Part of the problem, I think, is that Adam Sandler isn't effective as
the responsible type (although watching Adam the parent is better than
Adam the retard as in Waterboy). He has much more success playing the
lovable, desparate loser, such as he did in Gilmore and Singer than he
does playing a father figure. I'm sorry, but it's painful to watch
Sandler carefully bathing a 5 year old -- he has never been that sort of
persona and he fails to turn himself into one for the role.
The action builds up to a mind-bogglingly asinine courtroom scene, in
which Sandler has to deliver a pseudo-inspirational speech about
responsibility. Somebody gag me. His movies have thus far avoided this
sort of phony sentimentality, and even the most awful ones were better
for it. Whoever inspired Sandler (who, as I hear, was the final
authority on the film's script even though he didn't write it) or the
writer to go for the lurid hokeyness present throughout the last third
of Big Daddy should be credited for putting the stake through the film's
metaphorical heart.
Big Daddy isn't an insult to humanity, it's merely pure and constant
mediocrity. The laughs are few and far between and the movie never
succeeds in developing any sort of dramatic tension. I expected better
from Sandler, even though I've seen far worse from him.
Š1999 Eugene Novikov
Sent via Deja.com http://www.deja.com/
Share what you know. Learn what you don't.

Author
James Sanford
     Before I published my favorable review of Adam Sandler's "The
Waterboy" last fall, I should have heeded the warning Sandler used as
the title for one of his CDs -- "They're All Gonna Laugh At You."
And most of my friends and co-workers did exactly that, dismissing
"Waterboy" sight unseen as one more piece of garbage foisted upon the
screen, sometimes while adding comments such as "Now, 'There's Something
About Mary,' that was a real comedy," or "I'd rather see 'Babe: Pig in
the City'; I've heard that's just phenomenal."
O.K., "The Waterboy" was not a work of art. But it never purported
to be. (And I would rather sit through "Waterboy" 20 times in a row than
have to endure "Pig in the City" even one more time.)
Its sole purpose was to provide 90 minutes worth of jokes, which it
did. And, more often than not, Sandler and co-stars Kathy Bates and
Fairuza Balk hit the target, at least as frequently as Cameron Diaz, Ben
Stiller and Matt Dillon did in "Mary."
 "Big Daddy," Sandler's follow-up, is slightly more ambitious and,
unfortunately, much less successful.
Many comedians, at one point or another in their careers, become
obsessed with proving they can do something other than tickle the
funnybone. Often this leads to artistic disaster -- ever see Bill
Murray's shudder-inducing attempt at "The Razor's Edge"? -- in which
case the joke's on them. The best and worst that can be said about
"Daddy" is that it probably won't do any permanent damage to the careers
of anyone associated with it.
Sandler plays Sonny Koufax, a New Yorker who is living large off a
big insurance settlement, much to the dismay of his girlfriend and dad,
both of whom argue that it's time for the thirtysomething Sonny to
embrace maturity. An opportunity to do just that literally knocks on the
door when Sonny is presented with Julian (Cole and Dylan Sprouse), the
five-year-old product of his best friend Kevin's (Jon Stewart)
one-night-stand back in 1993. With Kevin conveniently in China for an
extended stay, Sonny seizes the chance to masquerade as his buddy and
adopt Julian, whose mother has conveniently died of a terminal illness.
If you're wondering why Social Services would start drawing up
adoption papers without so much as even asking for ID, or why a dying
woman would send her son to live with a dad he's never even met,
remember that looking for logic in an Adam Sandler movie makes about as
much sense as shopping for a tuxedo in Victoria's Secret.
Sonny's attempts at parenting are occassionally funny -- he has a
multitude of uses for newspaper, for example --  and the bond between
child and child-man is believable. What kindergartner wouldn't be
enamored of a father figure who plays along when the kid puts on
sunglasses he believes make him invisible and whose idea of discipline
is to murmur "go to your room, or do whatever you want"? Sandler and the
Sprouse twins click together, which means that even when the gags
fizzle, the scenes don't collapse.
But when "Daddy" dips into sentiment, it loses its balance.
Director Dennis Dugan ("Problem Child," "Happy Gilmore") doesn't seem to
know if he wants to parody "Kramer vs. Kramer" or remake it, and the
actors seem similarly lost. A climactic courtroom battle is neither
credible nor uproarious, and the movie's cop-out ending is ridiculous
even by Sandler standards.
The elements that make "Daddy" interesting are mostly on its edges.
There's some pleasantly feisty verbal sparring between Kevin's fiancee
Corinne (Leslie Mann) and Sonny over her past as a Hooters waitress, and
a surprisingly tolerant atitude toward Sonny's gay friends who he
accepts unquestioningly by noting "they just watch a different kind of
porno."  In another amusing bit, Sonny and potential new flame Layla
(Joey Lauren Adams) realize they're meant for each other when it's
discovered they share a mutual passion for the music of Styx; their
first kiss is underscored by the swoony "The Best of Times."
There's always an element of danger whenever a performer tries to
do something to broaden his or her audience and if "Daddy" is somewhat
spotty, it's still an admirable attempt by Sandler at something a bit
different. He can take some consolation in the fact that Robin Williams
had to headline plenty of pictures much worse than this before getting
to do "Dead Poets Society," "Awakenings" and "Good Will Hunting."
Patience and practice inevitably pay off.

Author
Greg King
Many local reviewers have already unfairly dismissed this film
before they have even seen it - purely because they dislike its star
Adam Sandler.  However, there are many people out there who seem to
like Sandler's deliberately low brow, dumb brand of humour, and
ultimately they will judge this film on its merits.
The romantic comedy The Wedding Singer showed a slightly
different side to Sandler's talents, and appealed to a broader
audience.  While Big Daddy is not quite as enjoyable, it is still one
of Sandler's more genial and pleasing efforts, and should also prove a
big hit.
Sandler often plays the petulant, eternal adolescent who is
eventually forced to grow up and face up to his responsibilities.  Big
Daddy takes this familiar premise, but adds a cute kid and some
emotional punch to the trusty formula.  Sandler plays Sonny Kouvacs, a
law school graduate who prefers the easy life, living off a
compensation deal from an old accident.  His girl friend Vanessa
(Kristy Swanson) despairs of him ever making a serious commitment to
their relationship.  When an accident of fate temporarily leaves Sonny
in charge of five year old Julian (newcomers Cole and Dylan Sprouse),
he finally sees fatherhood as a way of taking the next step in his
life.
However, Vanessa has dumped him for an older man, leaving
Sonny to raise the child alone.  Although initially reluctant to take
on any sort of responsibility, he gradually finds himself warming to
the boy, and a relationship develops between the pair.  Sonny finds
that Julian's presence helps in establishing a meaningful relationship
with beautiful lawyer Layla (Joey Lauren Adams, from Chasing Amy,
etc), who happens to be the sister-in-law of his former room mate.
Sonny is eventually forced to take the final step into long postponed
adulthood when he has to step into a courtroom to fight for his right
to adopt Julian.
Big Daddy has been written by Steve Franks, but Sandler and
regular collaborator Tim Herlihy have tailored the material to suit
the star's screen persona.  There are no great surprises here, as Big
Daddy is fairly formulaic stuff.  There are plenty of jokes about
urination, vomiting and other bodily functions, but it is all handled
with surprising restraint given the nature of the material.
Dennis Dugan, who previously directed Sandler in Happy
Gilmore, seems to know how to get the best out of his star.  He draws
a more restrained and thoughtful performance from Sandler.  The
Sprouse twins add to the cuteness factor with their irresistible,
hugely endearing turn as Sonny's foster son, and they will play a
major in the film's success.  Steve Buscemi is wonderfully droll in a
small role as a homeless derelict.
Big Daddy is often very funny.  But it also has enough heart
to appeal to audiences not usually drawn to Sandler's childish and
often puerile sense of humour.

Author
John Sylva
In famed comedian Adam Sandler's latest film, he portrays Sonny Koufax, a
thirty some year old law school graduate, unemployed, and care free man.  Sonny
lives with apartment roommate Kevin, (Jon Stewart) who is departing to China on
a business trip, leaving Sonny by himself, but not for long.  The day after
Kevin's departure, a child is left at Sonny's doorstep, Julian. (Cole and Dylan
Sprouse) Hoping to impress girlfriend Vanessa (Kristy Swanson), Sonny adopts
Julian, only to find out his girlfriend has fallen for an elderly man.  Along
the hour and a half the movie takes place, Sonny teaches Julian to express
himself in every way, and not worry what others think.  This is usually a good
moral, but when Sonny is teaching Julian how to spit and urinate on walls, the
moral becomes not so positive.  After meeting lawyer Layla, (Joey Lauren Adams)
whose sister is Kevin's fiancee Corinne, (Leslie Mann) Julian has a mother'
figure, due to her often presence at Sonny's apartment.  After an agency
threatens to take possession of the five year old Julian, Sonny calls in Layla
to help fight for the best interest of Julian in a court room scene, as the
screenplay falls to a common, unrealistic trial in which the outcome is
predictable.
The relationship between Corinne and Sonny works well, as Sonny continuously
cracks on her about past jobs, and her life, while she riffs on him back about
his unemployment and his life, which seems to be headed towards a black hole. 
Leslie Mann deserves more screen time, as her character's personality was
humorous and her character delivers funny dialogue, but unfortunately Mann was
only able to show off her acting abilities sporadically.  Joey Lauren Adams'
character was in drastic need of development, whose only past facts are that
she is a lawyer and Corinne's sister.  Joey Lauren Adams isn't to blame that
the screenplay, written by first time writer Steve Franks, had her going around
smiling rather than saying anything.
Big Daddy is an enjoyable movie, reaching beyond Adam Sandler's The Waterboy
(1998), which was Sandler's career lowpoint, as the humorous scenes were shown
in their entirety on trailers and advertisements for the film, and even those
weren't anything special.  Adam Sandler is at the height of his career with Big
Daddy, winning various people's choice awards, releasing films every few
months. After Big Daddy, I think America will move on from Sandler, and look
back to Jim Carrey, who has ruled the comedy industry for almost the entire
decade, as he is scheduled to appear in more than three movies in the next year
or so.
Adam Sandler is likable in Big Daddy, but his dialogue is repetitive, becoming
unfunny after about twenty minutes.  I doubted that Sandler would be able to
make any more successful movies after the low quality, The Waterboy, but
Sandler pulls it off.
Big Daddy is powered by an all star soundtrack, featuring the talents of Sheryl
Crow and Garbage.  The use of the song "Sweet Child of Mine" by Sheryl Crow
during Sonny's heartbreak when Julian may be taken from his possession was
intelligent, as the scenes and the emotional song make for the film's best
sequences.
Big Daddy tries to be funny, using comedy cliches, such as gay jokes, or
hurting people, but these repetitive jokes aren't funny anymore.  The frequent
sequences in which Sandler and Julian are taking pleasure in that of collapsing
roller blader's pain, laughs are forced, but die down as the pain of the roller
blader's becomes stronger, and I begin to question if injuring people is
humorous .  With Big Daddy, Sandler travels back around four years ago to his
Happy Gilmore days where he was an amateur comedian, fresh from Saturday Night
Live, defining his own genre.  Your own comedy genre should be something to
applaud, but Adam Sandler hit the same chords in each of his films, trying to
be funny by yelling and hurting people.  In 1998's The Wedding Singer, Sandler
got a boost from Drew Barrymore,  mixing his trademark comedy with romantic
comedy, creating a beyond satisfactory product.  Sandler's previous films have
been dawned with hundreds of millions of dollars at the box office, being
subject of many teenager's video collections, and have put Sandler in a
position where he is one of today's most loved comedians.  Sandler is very
likable and funny, but his films need to cover a larger variety of genres,
exploring other types of comedy, and possibly someday drama.
The Bottom Line- A feel good comedy, which couldn't come at a better time for
Sandler, the busy box office season that is the summer, and the high point of
his career.  Unfortunately, Big Daddy falls to Sandler's other movie's cliches.
 Director Dennis Dugan (Happy Gilmore, Problem Child) and writer Steve Franks
are to blame, not Sandler.

Author
David Wilcock
Starring Adam Sandler, Joey Lauren Adams and Josh Mostel
Directed By Dennis Dugan
Running Time: 1 hour 33 minutes
Adam Sandler vehicles are never anything special, but continue to make a
load of money. Which really goes to show the sad state of cinema today.
While good comedies like Rushmore, to choose a recent example, gets limited
release and doesn't make a lot of money, Big Daddy got a huge release and
has made a lot of cash. It's also nothing special and doesn't deserve the
money it's making. But I digress.
Sandler plays Sonny Koufax, a unemployed New Yorker with a seemingly low
mental age. His girlfriend makes a ultimatum to him: either wise up and get
responsible, or she's leaving him. By a strange set of events, Koufax ends
up with Julian (played by twins Cole and Dylan Sprouse) a five year old kid.
After a failed attempt to impress his girlfriend with the child, Koufax
decides he wants to keep the child. However, social worker Mr Brooks
(Mostel) finds out that Koufax isn't the real father and wants to take
Julian back. Koufax along with his new girlfriend Layla (Lauren Adams) fight
to keep the child.
Big Daddy really isn't that good. Many of the jokes revolve around toilet
humour, and supposedly we are meant to find Julian and Sonny peeing against
a wall to be funny. There's the occasional good one liner, but these are
usually strangely delivered wrong and lose most of the humour. The film,
after all these silly gags, then suddenly turns sentimental, and this is
where Big Daddy really goes from bad to hideous. The court scene at the end
of the film is useless and unbelievable, and not helped by the soppy
overacting. It's a poor attempt to win over the audience.
Adam Sandler basically plays the same role he has in his last few films
(except The Wedding Singer.) Joey Lauren Adams is much, much better, and
deserves a far better film than this trash. Steve Buscemi pops up in a funny
cameo, and his scenes are pretty funny. Rob Schneider is also funny as a
crazy delivery man. The two twins who play Julian are O.K, they start out
rather well, but then becoming annoying and brattish halfway through and
finally turn 'All American' wholesome goodness at the end of the film, where
the tear juice is turned up high.
Big Daddy is really nothing special, and is not even worth it for a few
chuckles. Although it is actually well put together, with nice direction,
good production design and even some montages, this professionalism can't
help the fact that the script and characters are trash. Big Daddy is for die
hard fans of Sandler, and that's about it.

Author
Mac VerStandig
Adam Sandler's latest film, Big Daddy, is an unreal one that is
candy-coated with humor lifted from Sandler's previous hit, Billy
Madison, while possessing a theme of romance common to his other smash
hit, The Wedding Singer. Further amplifying the overall lack of
reality is technical faultiness, and universally poor acting, save one
supporting role.
Sonny Koufax (Adam Sandler) is a 32-year-old law school graduate
throwing his life away. Despite the relative success of his friends
from law school, Sonny is going nowhere in life and seems to
procrastinate everything to the nth degree. Admittedly, he hasn't been
up before 11 AM in "like 10 years" and supposedly filed for social
security at age 30.
The only reliable constants in Sonny's life have been girlfriend
Vanessa (Kristy Swanson) and roommate Kevin (Jon Stuart). When Kevin
prepares to move to the Far East, and Vanessa informs Sonny that their
relationship is on the rocks, Sonny becomes desperate for something to
bring stability back to his pathetic life. So when the opportunity
literally knocks at his door, he becomes a temporary parent to
five-year-old Julian (Cole and Dylan Sprouse), as part of a grander
scheme to win Vanessa over.
This film is a collaboration of the romance from The Wedding Singer
and the humor from Billy Madison, both financial hits for
Sandler. When Sonny realizes that Vanessa is out of the picture for
good, and starts chasing Layla (Joey Lauren Adams), the supposedly
perfect girl, the parallels to The Wedding Singer cannot be
ignored. Ever more apparent are the similarities to Billy
Madison. Both are films focusing on an adult who hasn't fully reached
his potential in life, played by Adam Sandler. Also, both feature
several scenes in a school. But most obvious are the countless
big-boy-urinating-with-little-kid-in-awkward-place jokes that are
common to both productions. Coincidentally, both films also feature a
cameo from longtime Sandler friend, Steve Buscemi.
Extremely poor acting, for the most part, further degrades Big Daddy's
believability. Adam Sandler was near perfect in his previous comic
productions, and should be credited fully for their success. He was
also one of the undisputed forces behind his romantic film, The
Wedding Singer, and its success. However, just as Ben and Jerry's
tasty chocolate ice cream stains the company's beautiful shirts upon
contact, Sandler's multiple talents don't homogenize either. The
outcome is a lame Sandler who never fully explodes into his uproarious
vocal humor because he is constantly trying to be a sweetheart in love
at the same time. This is best highlighted in a scene where he learns
of and meets Vanessa's new boyfriend at the same time. Quickly
realizing him to be an older man, Sandler launches into a series of
age based jokes. Yet they simply aren't funny, probably due to the
restraint necessary as a result of Julian being in the room, thus
making Sandler hold back as he attempts to display affection
simultaneously.
Jon Stuart's wonderful talents as a standup comedian simply don't
translate into the ability to act well in this movie. His biggest
fault may well be his habit of overemphasizing each line, as comedians
of his nature do in order to receive laughs on each punch line. This
makes him sound very much like someone deliberately reading off cue
cards, and forgetting to actually act in the process. The finest
example of this is when Stuart's character, Kevin, is in the airport
preparing to board a plane when Sonny notifies him via cell phone that
Julian has appeared out of nowhere. As he steps to the side of the
plane's boarding line and volunteers to come back to assist Kevin, he
sounds more like R2-D2 than a grown man trying to make an important
decision.
Big Daddy's one positive asset is Joey Lauren Adams' acting. Despite a
harsh sounding accent, she delivers a very solid, funny, and romantic
performance as the second love in Sonny's life. She even manages to
stay clear of the negative force that Sandler brings, and truly stand
out on her own. This is best exhibited in a scene pitting both of them
in a public laundry facility.  Sandler chokes on the aforementioned
deadly combination of comedy and romance, while she sticks strictly to
the latter trait and actually makes the scene worthwhile in doing so.
Chief Lighting Technician Petr Hlinomaz's inconsistency from scene to
scene further harms any feeble remains of believability that Big Daddy
may still have. Several of the film's scenes revolve around putting
Julian to bed, and occur in his bedroom. The first scene of this
nature depicts a pitch dark room that even requires a nightlight for
the young child. Not only does the nightlight disappear in the
following scenes, but the room seems to get lighter and lighter as
these scenes progress.
Numerous little things continue to subtract from the reality that the
film attempts to posses during its 95 minute life span. These include,
but surely aren't limited to, scenes where Sonny throws himself in
front of a moving car and fails to display so much as a bruise;
Sonny's ability to find a full scuba diving outfit and change into it
in a matter of seconds; and the ability for a grown man and little boy
to urinate on the side of a building whenever they feel the urge, and
never encounter any reprecussions.
As Big Daddy opens, the screen is black. Then, over the next hour and
a half, unrealistic, hard to believe, poorly acted, and technically
deficient scenes run across the screen. One performance carries with
it a ray of light, but the movie is otherwise a waste of time, a waste
of money, and a waste of 35mm film. Perhaps things would have been
better had the screen stayed black.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Big Daddy (1999)
Adam Sandler, Joey Lauren Adams, Cole Sprouse, Dylan Sprouse, Rob 
Schneider, Jon Stewart, Josh Mostel, Leslie Mann, Allen Covert, Steve 
Buscemi, Kristy Swanson, Joe Bologna, Peter Dante, Jonathan Loughran. 
Story by Steve Franks. Screenplay by Steve Franks and Tim Herlihy & Adam 
Sandler. Directed by Dennis Dugan. 91 minutes.
Rated PG-13, 3 stars (out of five stars)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly
www.nuvo-online.com
Archive reviews at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Edward+Johnson-ott
To receive reviews by e-mail at no charge, send subscription requests to 
pbbp24a@prodigy.com
"Big Daddy" is crude and obvious, sloppy and mawkish, contrived and 
clumsily manipulative, and yet it still works. I went back for a second 
screening of the film, curious to see if it would charm me as much as the 
first time, and the damn thing did. The Adam Sandler comedy contains a 
laundry list of elements I find annoying -- standard-issue pratfalls and 
body function gags, sentimentality utterly lacking in finesse and even 
that most tiresome of clichés, the climactic courtroom scene -- but 
despite all the rubbish, there is something special going on here, 
something genuinely good-hearted and even brave, that made me surrender 
to "Big Daddy."
The premise is sheer hokum. When a little kid is left on his doorstep, 32 
year-old slacker Sonny Koufax (Sandler) "adopts" the boy, hoping to prove 
to his girlfriend that he's a responsible adult. She dumps him anyway and 
Sonny grudgingly tries to take care of the child until Social Services 
can find him a home. You can guess the rest.
On the surface, the film appears merely a calculated attempt to satisfy 
long-time Sandler fans with his usual combination of infantile humor and 
bursts of rage, while using the warm and fuzzy plot to nurture the 
mainstream viewers he gained with "The Wedding Singer." But there's more 
going on here than meets the eye. Quietly and oh-so carefully, Adam 
Sandler is challenging his own core audience, the army of young males 
crucial to the success of "Billy Madison," "Happy Gilmore" and "The 
Waterboy."
Outside of right-wing Christian extremists, young males are possibly the 
most homophobic people in America, yet "Big Daddy" includes an accepting 
portrayal of an affectionate gay male couple. The men, two of Sonny's old 
college buddies, behave like any romantic pair, sharing loving glances, 
cuddling and exchanging goodbye kisses. When another of Sonny's pals 
expresses discomfort with the guys' evolution from fellow frat-brothers 
to lovers, Sonny casually dismisses him, saying "They're still our 
brothers... our very, very gay brothers." Any jokes about the couple come 
not from their sexual orientation, but from the flustered reactions of 
others to their sexual orientation. Pretty nervy for an Adam Sandler 
movie.
But wait, there's more. Young males are also known for macho posturing, 
with their displays of bravado masking a fear of strong women, their own 
emotions, and the prospect of adulthood, aging and responsibility in 
general. "Big Daddy" features sisters Layla (Joey Lauren Adams) and 
Corinne (Leslie Mann), two extremely assured young woman. Layla, a 
hotshot lawyer, is clearly infatuated by Sonny, but sets her own 
boundaries and refuses to let him overwhelm her. Corinne is a doctor who 
was once a "Hooters" girl, a fact Sonny never lets her forget, but she 
never buckles despite his nonstop stream of insults (something else to 
consider -- here, Sandler mocks Corinne because she once worked at 
"Hooters" -- in his previous films, his characters would have worshipped 
her for that). 
Sonny comes to grips with his emotions over the course of the story, 
gradually tempering his anger outbursts, freely expressing his love for 
his young ward and even making a heartfelt reconciliation speech to his 
father (that leads to one of the funniest scenes in the movie). He makes 
repeated references to his thickening waistline (although he actually 
looks quite fit) and other aspects of aging and, after many hapless 
attempts at indulgent childrearing, comes to accept and embrace the 
responsibilities of adulthood. 
It's as if Sandler is gently telling his core audience, "Hey guys, it's 
okay to grow up. Confident women, parenthood, emotions and the whole 
aging thing aren't so scary, and by the way, picking on gay people is 
just plain stupid." As I said before, these are pretty daring notions for 
a fan base that considers fart jokes high art.
Of course, this is all subtext in a film that is sloppily constructed, to 
say the least, but it speaks volumes about the production's disarming 
sense of good will. Adding to the appeal is the sweet relationship 
between Sonny and five-year-old Julian (played by twins Cole and Dylan 
Sprouse) and the winning performance by "Chasing Amy's" radiant Joey 
Lauren Adams, who makes the most of her limited screen time. 
As for the rest of the cast, Rob Schneider is fun as an immigrant 
delivery man grappling with the English language and Steve Buscemi has a 
few good lines as a homeless man. Jon Stewart, playing Sonny's roommate, 
is sadly underused and Josh Mostel merely annoys as an ex-hippie turned 
priggish social worker.   
Despite its flaws, its many, many flaws, "Big Daddy" is a satisfying 
offering. In this cynical age, it's refreshing to see a movie that 
celebrates love, maturity and acceptance of others. Hopefully, as Adam 
Sandler continues to grow, both as an actor and a filmmaker, it will 
become easier to praise his work without having to add so many qualifying 
statements.

Author
Scott Renshaw
BIG DADDY
(Columbia)
Starring: Adam Sandler, Joey Lauren Adams, Dylan Sprouse, Cole Sprouse,
Josh Mostel, Rob Schneider, Leslie Mann, Jon Stewart.
Screenplay: Steve Franks and Tim Herlihy & Adam Sandler.
Producers: Sid Ganis and Jack Giarraputo.
Director: Dennis Dugan.
MPAA Rating: PG-13 (profanity, adult themes)
Running Time: 91 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     As alleged harbingers of the apocalypse go, Adam Sandler hardly seems
worth the consternation.  Sure, he's a comedian with a routine based
primarily on silly voices, screaming, and the broadest of broad humor.
He's also just the latest in a long tradition of anarchic adolescent
doofus humor, a tradition with forebears like the Three Stooges, Jerry
Lewis, Robin Williams and Jim Carrey.  A clown doing poo-poo jokes can
still be a pretty entertaining clown, which Sandler has done with sporadic
effectiveness in his previous films.
     In BIG DADDY, Sandler wants to be one of those laughing on the
outside, crying on the inside clowns, and plugs himself into a
sentimental, irritatingly generic high concept comedy.  Sandler plays
Sonny Koufax, a 32-year-old law school graduate who has decided that
laying around living off a big personal injury settlement is better than
practicing law.  His irresponsibility is beginning to wear on his
long-time girlfriend (Kristy Swanson), leading Sonny to contemplate a life
change.  The opportunity comes when 5-year-old Julian (Dylan and Cole
Sprouse), the heretofore unknown son of Sonny's roommate Kevin (Jon
Stewart) shows up at the door.  With Kevin on a business trip in China,
Sonny decides to become Julian's surrogate father, a job he quickly
realizes his more difficult than he anticipated.
     And therein the laughs ensue, at least every once in a while.
Sonny's laissez-faire parenting style produces plenty of scenes in which
Julian urinates in some public place, wears outrageous clothes, or repeats
profanities in his cuter-than-cute widdle boy voice.  Some are funny, some
are groan-worthy, and some just feel a little icky as a troubled child is
turned into a prop.  It's easier to latch on to the funny, however, when
Sandler is the irresponsible id-beast we all know and love -- screaming
out his dismay over missing McDonald's breakfast, eating cereal in front
of the television, slapping newspapers over Julian's wet bed like the boy
was a puppy.  Sandler as a long-lost Stooge, a la THE WATERBOY, is where
his mischievous personality works best.
     Sandler as a would-be actor, expanding his range with touching
personal relationships and gentle romantic banter, is a huge
miscalculation.  His previous attempt at broadening his audience, last
year's THE WEDDING SINGER, was successful because it remained rooted in
silliness and never got excessively mawkish.  BIG DADDY is the very
epitome of mawkishness, full of cutesy-pie chats with love interest Joey
Lauren Adams and sad-eyed father/son moments, all set to Teddy
Castellucci's syrupy string score.  Worse yet, it's a film into which any
one of several dozen actors could have been plugged with no change.  It's
a film in which the gags are just impediments to the protagonist learning
his Important Life Lesson.  Sandler, with his smirky grin and schoolyard
hostility, always looks like he'd rather be learning how to play a
Nintendo game.
     There are a few nice comic touches in BIG DADDY, from Steve Buscemi's
turn as an oddball homeless guy to a perfect faux-Barney kiddie video.
There are also plenty of irritating touches, like Rob Schneider's
indiscriminately Middle Eastern delivery guy and the
pound-it-into-the-ground references to Hooters.  BIG DADDY is the sort of
film where it becomes easy to pick on lazy inconsistencies like a
televised NHL game announced as "crucial to the standings" despite the
fact that the film takes place in October, the first month of the NHL
season.  If Sandler worried about keeping us laughing, and understood
he's more fun to watch when he is a child than when he has one, there
wouldn't be enough time to get bogged down in the cheap emotions or sloppy
writing.  Maybe some day he'll realize how much better off he is in the
HAPPY GILMOREs of his career, when the French get around to labeling him
a comic genius.

Author
Berge Garabedian
For more reviews and movie screensavers, visit http://www.joblo.com/
Adam Sandler likes to work with the same people. And why not. He went from
being just another schmucky "Saturday Night Live" alum trying to make it in
the movies, to a loud and proud member of the $20-Million a film club, and
friggin' huge in the movies! Back he is with his producer and screenwriting
buddies, Jack Giarraputo and Tim Herlihy from THE WATERBOY (5.5/10), THE
WEDDING SINGER (7/10) and HAPPY GILMORE (8/10), for a Sandler-look at being
a real-life big daddy.
PLOT:
Slacker/law school graduate cannot seem to get himself pumped up to do
anything until his girlfriend dumps his sorry ass due to his
irresponsibility. So he adopts a child to prove himself to said girlfriend,
but suddenly finds himself actually liking the kid more than just a vehicle
to cure his immature transgressions.
CRITIQUE:
Despite having seen his grown-up kid character umpteen times in various
other Sandler incarnations, this film still managed to be funny and cute,
filled with lowest common denominator jokes, an adorable kid and a
transparent plot. Now if you're not a Sandler fan, or have had just about
enough of his loveable loser characters-- sweet and nice on the inside,
unapologetic slackers on the outside, then chuck this one over to your video
rentals futures. But if you're like the rest of us, enjoy Sandler's idiocy,
and subconsciously live vicariously through his "never-wanna-grow-up"
adult-goof-boy characters (or Sandler himself...hard to distinguish really),
then sit back and enjoy this derivative character recycled in plenty of
laugh 'em up humor.
Yes, Sandler's character screams really loud when he gets upset and cracks
people up. Yes, there are plenty of easy piss jokes, barf jokes, gay jokes,
hooters jokes, and sports talk peppered throughout this
marketable-soundtrack-layered script. Yes, there are no less than three good
looking women in this film, who in real life wouldn't cross the street to
acknowledge Sandler's "if-not-a-movie-star" existence. But hey, this is an
Adam Sandler movie and I personally consider him to be a pretty funny dude,
despite his lack of creative Mike Myers flair. Unoriginality and weak story
aside, I suppose the film's contrived "emotional" ending also struck me as
somewhat artificial, but I guess we had to expect a slightly softer touch in
a film which treads superficially over a serious subject (adoption vs group
homes).
All in all, the kid's too darn cute to resist, Sandler does his regular
fun-loving schtick, chuckles abound, and many laugh-out loud jokes pop up
here and there (Although a lot of them are featured in the trailer.) I'm
curious to see how this film does with the general audience, seeing as
originality doesn't seem to be Sandler's strong suit. Oh yeah, please try
and remember to straddle your ears when Sheryl Crow wails into an
unnecessary version of the classic Guns 'N Roses hit "Sweet Child O'
Mine"...youch!
Little Known Facts about this film and its stars:
The script for this film was originally written by Steve Franks, his first
produced screenplay, but ultimately polished up by veteran comedy writers
Adam Sandler and Tim Herlihy. Herlihy is currently the head writer of TV's
"Saturday Night Live", member of the New York State Bar and played the
"Singing Kangaroo" in this film (Wow!). Producer Jack Giarraputo, who was
Sandler's third roommate alongside Herlihy at NYU, skipped out on his own
bar exam, and instead moved to Los Angeles and slept on Sandler's couch
(Great move!).
Director Dennis Dugan, who began his career as an actor, played double-duty
when he directed HAPPY GILMORE, as he was also one of its co-stars opposite
Sandler.
The kid who plays Julian in this film is actually two kids. Born identical
twins Cole and Dylan Sprouse, this duo make their feature film debut here,
despite some years experience as Brett Butler's youngest child on TV's
"Grace under Fire". Cole was actually the first actor to read for this role,
but is actually 15 minutes younger than Dylan. Both kids were born in
Arezzo, Italy, but raised in Southern California.
Julian's Scuba Steve toy is based on the Diver Dan doll that Adam Sandler
cherished as a child. When he lost his Diver Dan doll, his father dressed up
as Diver Dan and came to the front door. He said that the doll was with him
now, but "thanked me for watching over him while he grew up." Sandler
credits his father for doing "anything" to make him feel better.
This film marks actor Steve Buscemi's (Who will always be Mr. Pink from
RESERVOIR DOGS in my heart) fourth collaboration with Adam Sandler on film.
This film was originally titled GUY GETS KID. The film's dedication reads:
"This movie is dedicated to our fathers. Thanks for putting up with all of
our crap. We love you."

Author
Luke Buckmaster
BIG DADDY
Cast: Adam Sandler, Cole Sprouse, Dylan Sprouse, Joey Lauren Adams, Rob
Schneider, Leslie Mann, Steve Buscemi, Jon Stewart, Kristy Swanson
Director: Dennis Dugan
Screenplay: Steve Franks and Tim Herlihy & Adam Sandler
Reviewed by Luke Buckmaster
On the Buckmaster scale of 0 stars (bomb), to 5 stars (a masterpiece):
2 and a half stars
Screaming and groaning with his distinct,
screw-you-I-won't-do-what-you-tell-me tone, Adam Sandler also screams
down the throat of Hollywood's carefully evolved comedy genre.  The
comedy that we love to watch, or closer to the truth, the comedy that
Hollywood execs like to think that we love to watch, now seems stale and
uninspiring in comparison to Sandler's eruptions of cheap insults and
dry, unemotional observations.  Not just in his own right but in every
right, Sandler is a Superstar, a wild animal in Hollywood's fun park who
is not only able to jump in and out of his pen, he also gets paid and
celebrated for it.  Adam Sandler is cooland funnyand cracks lots of
great jokesor is he the greatest joke of them all?
Sandler's been around for a reasonable time - in the public eye, at
least, since 95's 'Billy Maddison', if you're a 'Saturday Night Live'
fan, even longer - so one might expect (and many would hope) that in
1999, he would go ballistic.  Rock the censors, Adam, shout your loudest
and fart your proudest, make monkey noises and let us roll on the floor
in shameful fits of laughter.  Alas, far before his time, he's taken the
coming-of-age approach and found (shudder) maturity and slight depth in
at least two of his roles.  In 'Big Daddy,' he preaches that love and
companionship make for a fulfilling life, in 'Happy Gilmore,' he
accidentally shoots a nail into his boss' head and later makes fun of
it.  Not that sentimentality has never been in a Sandler film -
'Gilmore' and 'Maddison' had romantic subplots and 'The Wedding Singer'
was obviously a love story - it's just never been this bleeding obvious,
or this forced.
There's a Cute Little Kid in 'Big Daddy' (played by identical twins Cole
and Dylan Sprouse) who also happens to be an orphan, and then there's
Big Daddy Sonny Koufax (Sandler) - a Homer Simpson prodigy who works one
day a week at a toll booth - who acts as his surrogate father, as a
means to impress women.  And it works, too, as Sonny meets Layla (sue,
Clapton, sue!), played by 'Jerry Maguire's' Joey Lauren Adams, and his
life soon begins to take direction.
Sonny raises his voice enough times to remind us that this _is_ an Adam
Sandler movie, although the jokes seem more marketed to a lawn bowls
club - perhaps with a free luncheon and cup of tea after the movie -
than the teenage audience.  Director Dennis Dugan, who actually has a
tiny role in the film as a reluctant Trick-or-Treat giver, is careful to
keep his material easily digestible and feel-good.  I find it hard to
believe that this is the same man who manipulated Sandler for some of
his most effective work thus far in 'Happy Gilmore,' a film that
effortlessly took the piss out of itself and never looked back to see
whether the audience was still smiling.  Signs that his comedic timing
is still on cue are evident in 'Big Daddy,' especially when Steve
Buscemi, who's always fun to watch, plays a homeless cynic with
effortless and hilarious conviction.  The difference between Buscemi and
Sandler: Buscemi can manage to look good in a bad picture.
However, I certainly wouldn't call 'Big Daddy' a bad picture.  I'm more
inclined to describe it as a piece that can't grasp or manipulate the
audience's emotions, and that makes for some amusing viewing when one of
its final scenes intends us to cry.  Instead, it's purely laughable.
How lovely that the film's centerpiece scene is in a courtroom, near the
film's conclusion, in which Sandler recites a bloated speech about his
undying love for Julian and his new found responsibility.  I had my
fingers crossed that the judge would recite a few lines from 'Billy
Maddison': "What you've just said is one of the most insanely idiotic
things I have ever heard. At no point in your rambling, incoherent
response were you even close to anything that could be considered a
rational thought. Everyone in this room is now dumber for having
listened."  Now _that's_ an Adam Sandler movie.


Author
Akiva Gottlieb
rated PG-13
Columbia Pictures
93 minutes
starring Adam Sandler, Joey Lauren Adams, Jon Stewart, Cole and Dylan
Sprouse, Josh Mostel, Leslie Mann, Allen Covert, Rob Schneider, Kristy
Swanson, Steve Buscemi
based on the story by Steve Franks
written by Steve Franks, Tim Herlihy and Adam Sandler
directed by Dennis Dugan
Adam Sandler makes more money than any other 32-year-old comic on the
planet, but he also takes more slack from the critics than basically
anyone else. To him, and to his fans, it should be a breath of fresh
air when I admit that I enjoyed his latest film, "Big Daddy".
The boyish Sandler stars as Sonny Koufax, a New York City law school
graduate who's a toll booth collector while preparing to eventually
take the bar exam. His life, however, is taking a turn for the worse,
as his girfriend(Kristy Swanson) dumps him for an older man. One day,
while his roommate(Jon Stewart) is in China on business, a
child(played by twins Cole and Dylan Sprouse) comes to the door with a
note saying that he is Julian, the product of a one-night-stand that
Sonny's roommate had 5 years before.
Seeking a sense of responsibility that he knows he has lost, and
partly to impress his girlfriend, he decides to become the father of
the child, named Julian. He decides to give him the life that his
father never gave him; a life where the father will not give orders;
he will merely make suggestions. This way of parenting makes the two
of them very good friends. They piss on walls; they trip oncoming
skaters, and they do what basically any Adam Sandler-raised child
thinks is cool.
Julian also helps Sonny get a girl named Layla, played by Joey Lauren
Adams of "Chasing Amy" fame. She turns out to be the sister of his
roommate's girlfriend(Leslie Mann), but she is charmed by his wit and
his newfound sense of "responsibility".
The usual eclectic clan of Sandler characters is back. Rob Schneider
plays a foreign delivery boy who comes to Sonny's apartment to Indian
wrestle him; Steve Buscemi plays a homeless man who desires a Sausage
McMuffin; and Allen Covert plays Sonny's gay friend(a sign of Sandler
becoming more PC). Sandler's early films, "Billy Madison" and "Happy
Gilmore", were unashamedly dumb, but also incredibly funny. His two
latest, and more popular, films, "The Wedding Singer" and "The
Waterboy" are my two least favorite of his. "The Wedding Singer"
misfired by trying to portray Sandler as a romantic lead. "The
Waterboy" went back to his dumb roots but turned out to be quite
unfunny. "Big Daddy", however, is a step in the right direction.
"Big Daddy" has taken "Happy Gilmore" director Dennis Dugan and
successfully combined Sandler's comedic and dramatic ability. "Big
Daddy" has its share of predicability and throwaway lines(not to
mention the cheesiness factor), but it's consistently funny and
entertaining, warmhearting and accessible.
Accessibility really is Adam Sandler's whole routine. He represents
those who may not have "talent", but he is showing them(and us) that
anyone can make it big. At heart, Sandler is still a teenager obsessed
with fart jokes. As for those who have talent and still don't make it
big...
a review by Akiva Gottlieb, The Teenage Movie Critic
akiva@excite.com
http://teenagemoviecritic.8m.com 


Author
Jamey Hughton
Starring-Adam Sandler, Cole Sprouse, Dylan Sprouse, Joey Lauren Adams,
Jon Stewart, Leslie Mann and Kristy Swanson
Director-Dennis Dugan
Rated PG
Although the picture of Adam Sandler raising a child is a frightening
thought, he is acting as a father figure in his newest comedy. Big Daddy
gives us an impression of what the spawn of Sandler may appear as, and
the result is much sweeter than suspected.
As his newest character, Sandler plays an incomparable slob named Sonny
Koufax, a law-school graduate who works one day a week at a toll booth
and spends the other six on the couch. That's when a five-year old
problem walks up to his door, in the form of a child who claims to be
his roommate's long-lost son. Unfortunately, the lucky father (Jon
Stewart) is on his way to China for a business trip. Sonny, for reasons
unknown at the time, takes the kid into open arms and decides to give
him a dose of the real world.
Young Julian is played by the tag-team acting duo of Cole and Dylan
Sprouse, two irresistibly cute twins who show a minimal stretch in
acting talents, but constitute perfectly for the demands of the role.
Sonny gives Julian a taste of his regular afternoon schedule, which
consists of going to the park and watching the roller bladers tumble to
their doom. Of course, the two lonely souls become attached to each
other, and Sonny begins to raise the little demon as his own.
But Sonny insists on teaching Julian the basics of  being a proper,
well-mannered young lad. He shows him that any and all spills can be
soaked up by a well-placed sheet of newspaper. He instructs him to dent
their cans of Alpha-Getti at the supermarket so that they can get the
discount price. He gives him a handy-dandy slingshot and a bag full of
marbles to slaughter innocent pigeons on the back deck. But despite the
fact that Sonny is offering Julian a completely misguided view on
growing up, it's obvious that he cares about the kid. And Sandler, the
king of naughty toilet humor, appears to be showcasing some charm here,
much the way he did in The Wedding Singer. Big Daddy does have a wider
range than something like The Waterboy, which appealed to only 13-25
year-old males in dire need of physical humor. But don't misread, this
is not his Truman Show. Big Daddy has the regular quotient of pee-pee
jokes and Sandler-orientated vulgarity, only toned down with sprinkles
of sweetness carefully mixed into the solution.
And he never did have a better chance of getting the girl either. There
are three respectable leading ladies in Big Daddy. Kristy Swanson plays
Sonny's original girlfriend Vanessa, until she runs off with a man twice
her age (or `Old Man River' as Sonny so eloquently puts it). Leslie Mann
plays Jon Stewart's stressed out fiancee, who is unable to socialize
because she once worked as a waitress at Hooters restaurant. The most
shimmering performance of all comes from Joey Lauren Adams (Chasing Amy)
as Mann's sister Layla, who falls head over heels for Sonny. Well,
mostly because of the cute child he's dragging around.
Big Daddy has plenty of funny moments; no gargantuan laughs, but a few
dozen hearty chuckles spaced evenly throughout. The finale in a
courtroom is played too seriously, and the premise gets drowned in
sentimental goo as it goes along, but the result is still rather
charming and entertaining. Adam Sandler movies are not intended to be
art. They exist to give people a good laugh, and Big Daddy manages just
fine.
It's also nice to see a jump in maturity for Sandler and company here,
even if it's just a marginal one. There are still bizarre supporting
characters, but no one truly annoying. Rob Schneider is funny as an
illiterate delivery man, as is Steve Buscemi in a small role as an Egg
McMuffin craving homeless man. Watch for some of Sandler's Waterboy
co-stars to appear as a few of his business partners and beer-guzzling
friends. But sorry, no Farmer Frau.
It's commendable of Adam Sandler to be attempting a change of pace. But,
fans of the big goof aren't going to be disappointed with Big Daddy.
Perhaps Sandler isn't so much an embarrassment to Hollywood as he is a
savior to the movie-going public. I feel I'm ready to finally accept the
comedian for what he is. And after this makes 200 million at the box
office, I'd bet your money on more projects to come.
MOVIE VIEWS by Jamey Hughton:  http://welcome.to/movieviews
.......................

Author
Homer Yen
This is the third movie that I've seen with Saturday Night Alumni Adam
Sandler, the other two being `The Wedding Singer' and `The Waterboy.' 
And having moderately enjoyed his last two offerings, I can say that
the one thing that really works for him is that he does well in stories
where he plays a simple-minded-underachieving-doofus-turned-hero.  When
he plays the gentle soul who occasionally releases his bottled-up
feelings of frustration, we can laugh at those minor eruptions.  And we
can generally laugh at his clueless demeanor and the way that he sort
of just lucks into the happy ending.  These ingredients are what give
Adam Sander the power to turn meaningless fluff into comedic,
blues-chasing films.  However, none of that happens in this film.  And
the result is a generally lifeless film that Sandler just doesn't have
the talent to save.  
Sandler plays Sonny Koufax, an underachieving jerk who is living off
the money won through a lawsuit.  Though he seems to possess some kind
of underlying intelligence, he has no concept of responsibility and
would rather spend his time displaying his skewed pathological
behavior, such as screaming at fast food clerks and throwing branches
in the path of oncoming inline skaters.  His lackadaisical attitude
prompts his girlfriend (Kristy Swanson) to leave him, telling him to
grow up.  He needs a quick-fix solution.  Amazingly, a lost waif shows
up at his doorstep.  His name is Julian and he is in search of his Dad
who may be Sonny's roommate (played by Jon Stewart).   Well, his
roommate is travelling, and Sonny, in his infinite wisdom, decides to
keep him as his own son.  He supposes that this decision will teach him
responsibility.  His decision will also prove that the rest of this
movie will amount to the entertainment value of 3AM diaper changes.
As a parent, Sonny should be reported to social services.  When Julian
requests a night light, Sonny brings him a neon sign that says `Live
Nudes.'  When Julian wets his bed, Sonny cover the wet areas with
newspaper and then places Julian on top.  And what fatherly things does
Sonny teach to his child?  Among other things, they include fielding
hard-hit baseballs, learning how to spit in a most disgusting manner,
and peeing on sides of buildings whenever it is convenient.  Sandler is
just trying to have fun with this material, but the more I thought
about Sonny being a father to Julian, the more appalled I became.
In `Big Daddy,' Sandler can't take the reigns of the material, which
deserves more weight.  The material was weak to begin with, and I think
that Sandler knew that.  To compensate, there are other components of
this film.  We meet up with an introspective homeless man (Steve
Buscemi who probably did this as a favor to Sandler) and are introduced
to two college buddies who are openly gay (if you are offended by two
men lustfully kissing, close your eyes upon seeing them for the first
time).  We also meet his roommate's girlfriend who was a former Hooters
girl.  The unfunny Hooters jokes go on and on and after a while, I was
really surprised that she just didn't shoot Sandler.  The only sane
element was Sandler's new girlfriend, Layla (Joey Lauren Adams).  Too
little too late.  The film finally reaches the epitome of discomfort at
the finale, which involves a court scene where Sonny tries to convince
everyone that he is a worthy father.  Perhaps a court will sentence
this to a quick trip to the video store.


Author
Walter Frith
Adam Sandler's movies are sort of like watching a performer on amateur
night at your local comedy club.  They serve a purpose (to make you
laugh, although just barely), and you hope that the next time you see
that particular comedic performer that he or she will be better.  In
fairness, Sandler has had some hysterically funny scenes recorded on
film.  The Sandler vs. Bob Barker bout in 'Happy Gilmore', Sandler
singing in the shower to Damon Wayans in 'Bulletproof' and Sandler
tackling a Colonel Sanders look alike in 'The Waterboy'.  When I'm alone
and reflect on the comedy films I've seen in the past few years, these
moments always make me laugh out loud.  Like other over rated comics
such as Jim Carrey and Martin Short, Sandler gets under your skin after
a while and I'm sure there will come a time when some people who support
the work of these guys will protest the motion picture academy to create
an Oscar category entitled "Best Performance By An Actor In A Silly
Role".
'Big Daddy' will offend some people who cling to the idea of traditional
family values and they will attack the film for setting a bad example
for children and while I'm one of the biggest supporters of family
values, this assumption would be wrong.  The movie IS NOT about teaching
the wrong values to impressionable children but rather one man making
the mistake of under estimating their impressionable minds and redeeming
himself by correcting the problem.
In 'Big Daddy', Sandler plays Sonny Kofaux, a man in his early thirties
who has all the qualities of a generation x-er.  He sleeps late, very
late.  He takes few things seriously in his life and doesn't quite
understand just where it is he fits in.  His apartment is a mess.  He
leaves potato chip bags and pop cans everywhere, never makes his bed and
won't fix the broken window next to the front garage like door of his
Manhattan apartment.  Sonny won $200,000 from a jury in a civil case
after a taxi cab ran over his feet and this accounts a lot for his
laziness and he has a one day a week job as a toll booth collector.  His
girlfriend Vanessa (Kristy Swanson) wants a more serious guy and ditches
him like Bill Murray's girlfriend did at the beginning of 'Stripes',
accusing him of never being able to do anything more with his life than
he's presently doing.  Sonny's room mate Kevin (Jon Stewart) is a big
time corporate honcho about to become a liaison executive for his
company in China.  After Stewart leaves, a little boy shows up at their
front door with a note claiming to be Kevin's son.  In Kevin's absence,
Sonny assumes his identity and tries to raise the little five year old
by himself with difficulty at first but later becomes attached to him
and vice versa.
Sonny life is layered with some interesting characters.  There is
Kevin's fiancée Corinne (Leslie Mann), Corinne's sister Layla (Joey
Lauren Adams) who develops a romantic relationship with Sonny.  A
foreign delivery man who speaks broken English and who befriends Sonny
(Rob Schneider).  A totally uproarious performance by Steve Buscemi as a
homeless guy who likes McDonald's food and Sonny's dad who's a hot shot
lawyer and wants his son to follow in his footsteps (Joseph Bologna).
I never lie and I have to admit that strangely, I enjoyed 'Big Daddy'.
I liked it because there are many characters who hold their own with
Sandler and actually upstage him on many occasions, especially the
Sprouse twins (Cole and Dylan) who play the five year old boy named
Julian at the center of the film's story line and emotional core who
simply steals hearts.  And the other supporting characters save this
film from being a total comedic misfire.  As you're watching the
courtroom climax scene, it is definitely silly and plays like camp
comedy but since this is the intention, it works!
'Big Daddy' is written by Steve Franks, Tim Herlihy and Adam Sandler and
is directed by Dennis Dugan and Sandler is one of the executive
producers and doesn't look as if he wants total control over the film
this time and gives the entire cast a fair shake and by violating the
first rule of show business that states you should never follow the act
of animals or children, Sandler mixes the innocence of the latter with
his own roadhouse humour and comes up with a mildly pleasing winner.
Visit FILM FOLLOW-UP by Walter Frith
http://www.cgocable.net/~wfrith/movies.htm

Author
Christopher Null
     Having seen young Anakin Skywalker in all those commercials, I was
curious to see how his pairing with Adam Sandler would pan out in this
revisionist STAR WARS called, strangely enough, BIG DADDY.
     We are first introduced to a young Obi-Wan Kenobi (Sandler), who
finds his life at a standstill, unable to progress to the next phase of
his Jedi training.  His wiser friend (and roommate) Qui-Gon Jinn (Jon
Stewart) leaves town for a land to the far east, stranding Obi-Wan with
nothing to do but live the life of a do-nothing.
     Obi-Wan is surprised by the arrival of young Anakin (twins Cole and
Dylan Sprouse), who gives the Jedi a real challenge, for which he finds
himself completely unprepared.  In this version, Skywalker is the lost
son of Qui-Gon, a turn which I don't think George Lucas will approve of.
     Obi-Wan undertakes the training of Anakin, teaching him the ways of
Jedi concentration (the ability to urinate in public), agility (pelting
him with baseballs), and etiquette (drooling to the ground and sucking
it back up).
     Only then is Anakin ready for the next step, helping Obi-Wan woo
Queen Amidala (Joey Lauren Adams), a wealthy and brilliant woman
seemingly out of Obi-Wan's reach.
     Also along for fun and comic relief is delivery guy Jar Jar Binks
(Rob Schneider), who, although completely created on a computer, looks
extremely realistic and lifelike (although you'll find his voice a bit
grating).  Two gay droids, R2-D2 (Peter Dante) and C-3PO (Jonathan
Loughran) also make for less serious moments.
     BIG DADDY takes a turn for the malevolent when social services
worker Darth Maul (Josh Mostel) threatens to take Anakin away from
Qui-Gon, and assumedly, place him in the hands of the dark side.  But a
dramatic confrontation in the Imperial Senate ensues, where the Jedis
successfully defend young Skywalker, and it's an appearance from elder
Jedi Master Yoda (Joe Bologna) who saves the day.
     Altogether, BIG DADDY is a fair entry into the Star Wars pantheon.
Although I was perplexed by some of the decisions of the filmmakers to
try to make this film into a comedy, I will be most intrigued to
discover how Anakin eventually turns into the malicious Darth Vader.
     Filmcritic.com has learned that this will be revealed in the film's
sequel: BIGGER DADDY.
Director: Dennis Dugan
Producer: Sid Ganis, Jack Giarraputo
Writer: Steve Franks, Tim Herlihy, Adam Sandler
Starring: Adam Sandler, Joey Lauren Adams, Jon Stewart, Allen Covert,
Rob Schneider, Josh Mostel, Cole Sprouse, Dylan Sprouse, Leslie Mann
Christopher Null - null@filmcritic.com - http://www.filmcritic.com
Author - Network Administrator's Reference, 1999, ISBN 0-07-882588-1
http://www.amazon.com/exec/obidos/ASIN/0078825881/filmcriticcom

Author
Dustin Putman
Directed by Dennis Dugan.
Cast: Adam Sandler, Cole Sprouse, Dylan Sprouse, Joey Lauren Adams, Rob 
Schneider, Leslie Mann, Jon Stewart, Allen Covert, Kristy Swanson, Josh 
Mostel, Steve Buscemi.
1999 - 91 minutes
Rated PG-13 (for profanity and bathroom-style humor).
Reviewed June 26, 1999.
Who would have thought that when Adam Sandler first appeared in a starring 
role on the big screen in 1995's inane "Billy Madison," I would be saying 
that Sandler is maturing as an actor four years later. Since that lowpoint in 
his feature film career, indeed Sandler has grown on me. 1996's "Happy 
Gilmore" was at least funny, and 1998's sleeper smash hit, "The Waterboy," 
was mediocre but passable (thanks mostly to the supporting performances from 
Kathy Bates and Fairuza Balk). It wasn't until February of '98, however, that 
I actually found a Sandler film that I could wholeheartedly say that, yes, I 
loved that movie. Its name was "The Wedding Singer," and with Sandler not 
constantly being a doofus and aided by the sparkling Drew Barrymore, it was 
one of the most entertaining films of the whole year. "Big Daddy," Adam 
Sandler's latest comedy, has attempted to mix his token bathroom humor for 
the hormonal teenage male audience with the lighthearted and sweet tone of 
"The Wedding Singer." The result is a film that is merely good, quite flawed, 
but, yes, Sandler is maturing as an actor.
Sonny Koufax (Adam Sandler) is a 32-year-old guy living in NYC who went to 
college to become a lawyer, but never became one because he refused to take 
the bar exam. Working only one day a week as a tollbooth operater, his 
girlfriend, Vanessa (Kristy Swanson), is becoming frustrated because, as she 
tells him, "you refuse to move on to the next phase of your life." Right 
after his best friend and roommate, Kevin (Jon Stewart), has left to work in 
China, the 5-year-old, cute-as-a-button Julian (twins Cole and Dylan Sprouse) 
is literally left at his doorstep with a note that says Kevin is his 
biological father. All alone in the world, Sonny kindly takes Julian into his 
home, and before long, Vanessa is out of the picture too, leaving him for an 
old man with "a 5-year plan." Until a foster family is found, Sonny (posing 
as Kevin) convinces the social worker to let him keep Julian, as opposed to 
staying in an orphanage. But a funny thing happens on the way through the 
adoption process, as Sonny grows deeply attached to Julian and sees it as a 
way to finally grow up himself.
"Big Daddy" is a spirited, very funny heartwarmer that actually, like "The 
Wedding Singer," turns out to be a lot more humorous than Sandler's more 
straightforward comedies. The film especially gains laughs from the 
observations of watching Sonny's decidedly easy-going, "loose" parenting 
style and from the supporting characters, including a Russian delivery man 
(Rob Schneider) and a wacky homeless guy (Steve Buscemi). The movie also has 
its fair share of peeing jokes and physical pratfalls to satisfy any juvenile 
fan, but they are kept more discreet than the majority of Sandler's past 
excursions.
What many might be surprised about concerning "Big Daddy," however, is that 
the film also works as a bittersweet, comedy-laced drama, and also as a sweet 
little romance. The drama becomes more apparent during the climax, which 
inevitably takes place in court, with Sonny in a custody battle. 
Unfortunately, this is the film's weakest link, as the sappiness starts to 
grow a bit thick by this point, but saves itself with a wrap-up that might 
not be quite as predictable as you'd expect.
The romance, although slightly underwritten and more effective in "The 
Wedding Singer" (then again, that movie revolved around the love story), 
actually turns out to work very well, thanks mostly to Joey Lauren Adams 
(1997's marvelous "Chasing Amy"), as Layla, a beautiful, young lawyer and the 
sister of Kevin's fiancee, Corinne (Leslie Mann), a former Hooters waitress 
who despises Sonny. Adams is a radiant, natural actress who can brighten up 
any scene in any movie she appears in (whether it be "Chasing Amy," 1993's 
nostalgic "Dazed and Confused," or this year's criminally overlooked "A Cool, 
Dry Place," opposite Vince Vaughn). Adams and Sandler share an especially 
charming scene that left me with a huge, dorky smile plastered across my 
face, in which they tell Julian a bedtime store, replacing their own budding 
relationship with that of a rabbit and a squirrel. Come to think of it, that 
grin returned onto my face every time Adams appeared.
And finally, in the limelight of everything, is Adam Sandler, who has finally 
become a movie actor that I really, really enjoy. Here he replaces any sort 
of grating personality with that of an affectionate one, and still never 
loses sight of his own comic talents. Watching Comedy Central's recent 
"Canned Ham" episode on the making of "Big Daddy," in which we meet and talk 
with Sandler's own family, I learned that Sandler is a normal, caring man, 
and one with a lot of love to give his family, friends, and relatives. With 
that said, Sandler's Sonny is probably the closest he has come to portraying 
himself, and works wonders with Cole and Dylan Sprouse, adorable twins who 
play Julian and escape without becoming unctuous and annoying like most kid 
actors.
For all of the charm "Big Daddy" has, the film is pretty light stuff, not 
deep or meaningful or even that memorable. It's also hard to believe, for 
example, that Sonny could keep such a nice, roomy loft by only working one 
day a week. The aforementioned courtroom scene is corny as only mainstream 
films can be, but I surprisingly didn't mind that much, in spite of myself. 
If anything, the movie is funny, plain and simple, and due to the several 
noted performances that are far above this slight material, I found I was 
enjoying "Big Daddy" quite a lot. Probably more than I had any right to.
      - Copyright 1999 by Dustin Putman
        Http://hometown.aol.com/FilmFan16/index.html
